New York, session 2025-2026, S3254.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 the town board of the town of Southold, county of Suffolk, is hereby 3 authorized to accept from GKLF, LLC, grantee, a petition for a refund 4 from the town real estate transfer tax, imposed pursuant to section 5 1449-bb of the tax law, with respect to a conveyance of real property 6 occurring on June 22, 2021 for the parcel conveyed to such grantee, with 7 such parcel having an address of 7800 Alvahs Lane in the hamlet of Cutc- 8 hogue, town of Southold, county of Suffolk, otherwise known as Suffolk 9 county tax map district 1000, section 101.00, block 01.00, lot 019.001. 10 If accepted, the application shall be reviewed as if the provisions of 11 paragraph (j) of subdivision 2 of section 1449-ee of the tax law had 12 been complied with before June 22, 2021. 13 If satisfied that such grantee would otherwise be entitled to such 14 exemption if such grantee had complied with the provisions of paragraph 15 (j) of subdivision 2 of section 1449-ee of the tax law before June 22, 16 2021, the town board of the town of Southold, may grant the refund. If 17 the refund is granted and such grantee shall have paid the town real 18 estate transfer tax, the town board, in its sole discretion, shall 19 provide for the refund of the tax paid. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire one year 21 after it shall have become a law when upon such date the provisions of 22 this act shall be deemed repealed. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07543-01-5